District of Columbia statutes.
5-105.02

Repealed

District of Columbia Chief of Police.

Repealed.

May 1, 1998, 112 Stat. 100, Pub. L. 105-174, § 10007
May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-154, § 4, 55 DCR 3678
1981 Ed., § 4-104.1.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 832 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).